Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-110
Statement of rights.

A person in the State of Nebraska has the right to live free from violence, or intimidation by threat of violence, committed against his or her person or the destruction or vandalism of, or intimidation by threat of destruction or vandalism of, his or her property regardless of his or her race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, or disability.

Laws 1997, LB 90, § 2.